Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-164
Conservation and Survey Division; powers; director; expenses.

The Conservation and Survey Division is given police power and authority for the purpose of carrying into effect and performing the duties defined in section 85-163. The Board of Regents shall appoint a chief or director of the division, who shall direct the work of the division, subject to the approval of the regents. All expenses incurred in carrying out any of the provisions of sections 85-163 to 85-165 shall be subject to the approval of the regents of the University of Nebraska, and paid out of appropriations made from time to time by the Legislature.

Laws 1921, c. 16, § 2, p. 102;

C.S.1922, § 6774;

C.S.1929, § 85-164.